test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-osh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - ош: # Ordinary nouns 'city' - full paradigm including MWN
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ош
     ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ошень
     ош+N+SP+Abl+Indef: ошта
     ош+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ошенди
     ош+N+SP+Abe+Indef: ошфтома
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: ошешка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+Indef: ошса
     ош+N+SP+Ela+Indef: ошста
     ош+N+SP+Ill+Indef: [ошу, ошс]
     ош+N+SP+Prl+Indef: ошева
     ош+N+SP+Tra+Indef: ошкс
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ошезе
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ошене
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ошезень
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ошенень
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ошезти
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ошненди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: оштон
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: ошфтомон
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: ошешкан
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: ошсон
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: ошстон
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ошезон
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: ошеван
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ошце
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ошне
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ошцень
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ошнень
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: ошдот
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: ошфтомот
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: ошешкат
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: ошсот
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: ошстот
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ошезот
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: ошеват
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ошец
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ошенза
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ошенц
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ошензон
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ошенцты
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ошензонды
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: оштонза
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: ошфтомонза
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: ошешканза
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: ошсонза
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: ошстонза
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: ошезонза
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: ошеванза
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ошеньке
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ошеньконь
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ошеньконди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: ошедонк
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: ошфтомонк
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: ошешканк
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: ошсонк
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: ошстонк
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: ошезонк
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: ошеванк
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ошенте
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ошентень
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ошентенди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: ошедонт
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: ошфтомонт
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: ошешкант
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: ошсонт
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: ошстонт
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ошезонт
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: ошевант
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: ошсна
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: ошснон
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: ошснонды
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: оштост
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: ошфтомост
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: ошешкаст
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: ошсост
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: ошстост
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ошезост
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: ошеваст
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ошт
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ошсь
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ошть
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ошти
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ошне
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ошнень
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ошненди    
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: ошевок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: ошеньвок
     #ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: ошеньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: синьге 
     ош+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: оштовок
     ош+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: ошендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: ошфтомовок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Foc/вок: ошешкавок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: ошсовок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: ошстовок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: ошезовок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: ошевавок
     ош+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: ошекска
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошезевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошеневок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошезеньге
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошененьге
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошезтивок
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошенендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: оштонга
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошфтомонга
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошешканка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошсонга
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошстонга
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошезонга
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: ошеванга
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошцевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошневок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошценьге
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошненьге
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: оштотка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошфтомотка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошешкатка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошсотка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошстотка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошезотка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: ошеватка
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошцевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошензовок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошенцка
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошензонга
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошенцтывок
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошензондывок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: оштонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошфтомонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошешканзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошсонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошстонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошезонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: ошеванзовок
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошенькевок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошеньконьге
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошенькондивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: оштонковок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошфтомонковок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошешканковок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошсонковок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошстонковок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошезонковок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: ошеванковок
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошентевок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошентеньге
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошентендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: оштонтка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошфтомонтка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошешкантка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошсонтка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошстонтка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошезонтка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: ошевантка
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошсновок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошснонга
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошснондывок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: оштостка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошфтомостка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошешкастка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошсостка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошстостка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошезостка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: ошевастка
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: оштка
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: ошське
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: оштьке
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: оштивок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: ошневок
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: ошненьге
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: ошнендивок
